Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Retailers

154A.400.
Statewide network of lottery retailers — Criteria for selection — Uniform fees — Suspension, revocation or termination of contract — Purchase or lease of on-line equipment — Contracts not transferable or assignable — Certificates — General Assembly members not prohibited from being retailers — Payment of prize — Sales tax exemption.

The General Assembly hereby recognizes that to conduct a successful lottery, the corporation must develop and maintain a statewide network of lottery retailers that will serve the public convenience or promote the sale of tickets, while insuring the integrity of the lottery.
(1) (a)

The General Assembly hereby recognizes that to conduct a successful lottery, the corporation must develop and maintain a statewide network of lottery retailers that will serve the public convenience or promote the sale of tickets, while insuring the integrity of the lottery.

To govern the selection of lottery retailers, the board shall, by administrative regulation, develop a list of objective criteria upon which the selection of lottery retailers shall be based. Separate criteria shall be developed to govern the selection of retailers of instant tickets and on-line retailers. In developing these criteria the board shall consider such factors as the applicant’s financial responsibility, security of the applicant’s place of business or activity, integrity, and reputation; however, the board shall not consider political affiliation, activities, or monetary contributions to political organizations or candidates for any public office. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to the following:

The applicant shall be current in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to any taxing subdivision where the lottery retailer will sell lottery tickets;

The applicant shall be current in filing all applicable tax returns and in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant to applicable statutes;

No person, partnership, unincorporated association, corporation, or other business entity shall be selected as a lottery retailer for the sale of instant tickets or on-line games who:

Has been convicted of a felony related to the security or integrity of the lottery in this or any other jurisdiction, unless at least ten (10) years have passed since satisfactory completion of the sentence or probation imposed by the court for each felony;

Has been convicted of any illegal gambling activity in this or any other jurisdiction, unless at least ten (10) years have passed since satisfactory completion of the sentence or probation imposed by the court for each conviction;

Has been found to have violated the provisions of this chapter or any administrative regulation adopted hereunder, unless at least ten (10) years have passed since the violation;

Is a vendor or an employee or agent of any vendor doing business with the corporation;

Resides in the same household as an officer of the corporation; or

Has made a statement of material fact to the corporation, knowing such statement to be false, unless at least ten (10) years have passed since the statement was made.

Retailers shall be afforded the same exceptions to disqualification as provided for vendors in KRS 154A.600(4)(a) and (b) or (c).

In addition to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, no person, partnership, unincorporated association, corporation, or other business entity shall be selected as an on-line lottery retailer who:

Has been denied a license to sell instant tickets on the basis of objective criteria established by the board, or any provision of this chapter; or

Has failed to sell sufficient instant tickets to indicate that the location of an on-line game at his outlet would be of economic benefit to him or the lottery corporation.

The applicant shall not be engaged exclusively in the sale of lottery tickets. However, this paragraph does not preclude the corporation from contracting for the sale of lottery tickets with nonprofit, charitable organizations or units of local government in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Persons applying to become lottery retailers shall be charged a uniform application fee for each lottery outlet. Retailers chosen to participate in on-line games shall be charged a uniform annual fee for each on-line outlet.

Any lottery retailer contract executed pursuant to this section may, for good cause, be suspended, revoked, or terminated by the president if the retailer is found to have violated any of the objective criteria established by the board as provided in subsection (1) of this section. Review of such action shall be in accordance with the procedures outlined in KRS 154A.090. All lottery retailer contracts shall be renewable annually after issuance unless sooner canceled or terminated.

A retailer who has been denied an on-line game for reasons other than financial responsibility, security, or integrity shall be permitted to purchase or lease the equipment necessary to operate such a game from the corporation in a manner consistent with the corporation’s manner of acquisition. A retailer need not file an appeal before being permitted to purchase or lease on-line equipment.
(2) (a)

A retailer who has been denied an on-line game for reasons other than financial responsibility, security, or integrity shall be permitted to purchase or lease the equipment necessary to operate such a game from the corporation in a manner consistent with the corporation’s manner of acquisition. A retailer need not file an appeal before being permitted to purchase or lease on-line equipment.

After one (1) year of operation, any retailer who purchased or leased on-line equipment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection and whose sales are equal to or greater than the statewide average of sales of on-line retailers, shall be reimbursed the cost of the purchase or lease by the corporation. The board may purchase the terminals of other retailers who purchased their equipment if the board determines that such purchase is in the best interest of the lottery.

No lottery retailer contract awarded under this section shall be transferable or assignable. No lottery retailer shall contract with any person for lottery goods or services except with the approval of the board.

Each lottery retailer shall be issued a lottery retailer certificate which shall be conspicuously displayed at the place where the lottery retailer is authorized to sell lottery tickets. Lottery tickets shall only be sold by the retailer at the location stated on the lottery retailer certificate.

A member of the General Assembly who meets the same requirements as any other applicant to be a retailer may be granted a retail contract to sell lottery tickets or participate in any other lottery game operations. No member of the General Assembly shall be entitled to preference over any other applicant for a contract.

For the convenience of the public, all retailers shall be authorized to pay winners up to six hundred dollars ($600) after the retailer performs validation procedures appropriate to the lottery game involved. Lottery tickets shall be exempt from the Kentucky sales tax.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1 § 9, effective December 15, 1988.

154A.410.
Content of contracts — Powers of president in regard to contracts.

Any contract executed by the corporation pursuant to this chapter shall specify the reasons for which any contract may be suspended, revoked, or terminated by the corporation, including, but not limited to:

Commission of a violation of this chapter or administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

Failure to accurately account for lottery tickets, revenues, or prizes as required by the corporation;

Commission of any fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation;

Insufficient sale of tickets;

Conduct prejudicial to public confidence in the lottery;

Any material change in any matter considered by the corporation in executing the contract with the retailer;

Failure to meet any of the objective criteria established by the board pursuant to KRS 154A.400(1).

If, in the discretion of the president, such denial, revocation, suspension or rejection of renewal is in the best interests of the lottery, the public welfare, or the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the president may suspend, revoke, or terminate, after notice and a hearing, any contract issued pursuant to this chapter. Such contract may, however, be temporarily suspended by the president without prior notice, pending any prosecution, hearing, or investigation, whether by a third party or by the president. A contract may be suspended, revoked, or terminated by the president for one (1) or more of the reasons enumerated in subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 10, effective December 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 170, § 10, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.420.
Proceeds from ticket sales to constitute trust fund — Administrative regulation governing retailers’ deposit of lottery proceeds — Liability of lottery retailers — Priority of debt to corporation — Lien to secure retailer’s obligation to remit proceeds.

All proceeds from the sale of lottery tickets received by a person in the capacity of a lottery retailer shall constitute a trust fund until paid to the corporation either directly, or through the corporation’s authorized collection representative. Proceeds shall include unsold instant tickets received by a lottery retailer and cash proceeds of sale of any lottery products, net of allowable sales commissions and credit for lottery prizes paid to winners by lottery retailers. Sales proceeds and unused instant tickets shall be delivered to the corporation or its authorized collection representative upon demand. The corporation shall, by administrative regulation, require retailers to place all lottery proceeds due the corporation in accounts in institutions insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation not later than the close of the next banking day after the date of their collection by the retailer until the date they are paid over to the corporation. The corporation may require a retailer to establish a single separate electronic funds transfer account, where available, for the purpose of receiving moneys from ticket sales, making payments to the corporation, and receiving payments from the corporation. Lottery retailers shall be personally liable for all proceeds. This section shall apply to all lottery tickets generated by computer terminal, other electronic device, and any other tickets delivered to lottery retailers.

Whenever any person who receives proceeds from the sale of lottery tickets in the capacity of a lottery retailer becomes insolvent, or dies insolvent, the proceeds due the corporation from such person or his estate shall have preference over all debts or demands.

A lien is hereby given to the corporation on all funds and other personal property, on all real property, and on all rights to real or personal property owned or subsequently acquired by each retailer in the amount of, and to secure, the retailer’s obligations to remit lottery proceeds to the corporation. The lien shall be in the amount of all sums due to the corporation at any time, together with all interest, penalties, fees, commissions, charges, and other expenses incurred by reason of nonpayment of the lottery proceeds to the corporation or in the process of collecting those proceeds, and shall have priority over any other obligation or liability for which the funds or real or personal property are liable. The lien shall be of equal rank with the tax liens of the state, or any city, county, or other taxing authority within the state. The lien shall arise upon the receipt of lottery proceeds by the retailer, whether or not the retailer is at that time obligated to remit all or any portion of those proceeds to the corporation, and shall be enforceable until the liability is paid or extinguished.
(3) (a)

A lien is hereby given to the corporation on all funds and other personal property, on all real property, and on all rights to real or personal property owned or subsequently acquired by each retailer in the amount of, and to secure, the retailer’s obligations to remit lottery proceeds to the corporation. The lien shall be in the amount of all sums due to the corporation at any time, together with all interest, penalties, fees, commissions, charges, and other expenses incurred by reason of nonpayment of the lottery proceeds to the corporation or in the process of collecting those proceeds, and shall have priority over any other obligation or liability for which the funds or real or personal property are liable. The lien shall be of equal rank with the tax liens of the state, or any city, county, or other taxing authority within the state. The lien shall arise upon the receipt of lottery proceeds by the retailer, whether or not the retailer is at that time obligated to remit all or any portion of those proceeds to the corporation, and shall be enforceable until the liability is paid or extinguished.

The lien imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be valid as against any purchaser, judgment lien creditor, or holder of a security interest or mechanic’s lien until notice of the corporation’s lien has been filed by the corporation with the county clerk of any county or counties in which the retailer’s business or residence is located, or in any county in which the retailer has an interest in property. The recording of the lien shall constitute notice of both the original obligation to the corporation and all subsequent obligations to the corporation of the same retailer. Upon request, the corporation shall disclose the specific amount of liability at any given date to any interested party legally entitled to the information.

Even though notice of a lien has been filed as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, and notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 382.520, the lien imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be valid with respect to a security interest which comes into existence after the notice of lien has been filed by reason of disbursements made within forty-five (45) days after the date the lien was filed or the date the person making the disbursements had actual notice of the lien filing, whichever is earlier, if the security interest:

Is in property which at the time of filing is subject to the lien imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection, and is covered by the terms of a written agreement entered into before the lien is filed; and

Is protected under local law against a judgment lien arising as of the time of the lien filing, out of an unsecured obligation.

The corporation shall be afforded the same rights and remedies with respect to enforcement of any lien and collection of lottery proceeds as is afforded state, county, city, and other taxing authorities by KRS Chapter 134.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 13, effective December 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 170, § 11, effective July 15, 1994.

154A.430.
Computation of retailer’s rental payments.

If a lottery retailer’s rental payments for the business premises are contractually computed, in whole or in part, on the basis of a percentage of retail sales, and such computation of retail sales is not explicitly defined to include sales of tickets in a state-operated lottery, the compensation received by the lottery retailer from the lottery shall be considered the amount of the retail sale for purposes of computing the rental payment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 14, effective December 15, 1988.

154A.440.
Ticket price — Gift — Sale — Tickets given as means of business promotion — Location of sale.

No person shall sell a ticket at a price other than that established by the corporation, unless authorized in writing by the president. No person other than a duly certified lottery retailer shall sell lottery tickets, except that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a person who may lawfully purchase tickets from making a gift of lottery tickets to another. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the corporation from designating certain of its agents and employees to sell lottery tickets directly to the public.

Lottery tickets may be given by merchants as a means of promoting goods or services to customers or prospective customers subject to approval by the corporation.

No lottery retailer shall sell a ticket away from the locations listed in his contract.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15, effective December 15, 1988.

154A.450.
Lottery vending machines located within sight of retailer’s employee — Exceptions.

Except for lottery vending machines located in factories or lottery vending machines located in package liquor stores, bars, or taverns to which persons under the age of eighteen (18) years are not permitted access, a lottery retailer shall locate any vending machine from which lottery tickets are dispensed in the sight of the employees of the lottery retailer.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to blind persons who operate vending machines as a part of a program established by federal or state law.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.